Rhode Island, session 2025, SB153.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-3 of the General Laws entitled "Employment of Children" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
28-3-1.1. Definitions.
When used in this chapter the following words and phrases are constituted as follows:
(1) "Compensation" means anything of value, to include money or funds received in
exchange or for consideration for providing a service, work or product.
(2) "Family" means a group of persons related by blood or marriage, including civil
partnerships, or whose close relationship with each other, is considered equivalent to a family
relationship by the individuals.
(3) "Minor" means any person under eighteen (18) years of age.
(4) "Online platform" means any public-facing website, web application, or digital
application, including a mobile application, to include, but not be limited to, a social network,
advertising network, mobile operating system, search engine, email service, or Internet access
service.
(5) "Superintendent of schools" means an individual employed in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 2 of title 16 and exercising the powers and duties enumerated in § 16-2-11.
(6) "Trust fund" means an arrangement that allows or requires an entity or individual to
place assets or compensation in an account to benefit another person or entity.

(7) "Vlog" or "Vlogging" means content shared on an online platform in exchange for
compensation.
(8) "Vlogger" means an individual or family that creates video content, performed in Rhode
Island, in exchange for compensation, and includes any proprietorship, partnership, company, or
other corporate entity assuming the name or identity of a particular individual or family for the
purposes of that content creation.
28-3-9.2. Minors featured in vlogs.
(a) A minor under the age of eighteen (18) is considered engaged in the authorized work
of vlogging, when the following criteria are met at any time during the previous twelve (12) month
period:
(1) At least thirty percent (30%) of the vlogger's compensated video content, produced
within a thirty (30) day period included the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor. Content
percentage is measured by the percentage of time the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor
visually appears or is the subject of an oral narrative in a video segment, as compared to the total
length of the segment; and
(2) The number of views received per video segment, on any online platform meet the
online platform's threshold for the generation of compensation or the vlogger received actual
compensation for video content equal to or greater than ten cents ($0.10) per view.
(b) With the exception of § 28-3-9.3, the provisions of this chapter do not apply to a minor
engaged in the work of vlogging.
(c) All vloggers whose content features a minor under the age of eighteen (18) engaged in
the work of vlogging, shall maintain the following records and shall provide them to the minor on
an ongoing basis:
(1) The name and documentary proof of the age of the minor engaged in the work of
vlogging;
(2) The number of vlogs that generated compensation as described in subsection (a) of this
section during the reporting period;
(3) The total number of minutes of the vlogs that the vlogger received compensation for
during the reporting period;
(4) The total number of minutes each minor was featured in vlogs during the reporting
period;
(5) The total compensation generated from vlogs featuring a minor during the reporting
period; and
(6) The amount deposited into the trust fund established in § 23-3-9.3 for the benefit of the
LC000602 - Page 2 of 6

minor engaged in the work of vlogging, as required by § 28-3-9.3(a)(1).
(d) If a vlogger to include, but not limited to, a family member, whose vlog content features
minors under the age of eighteen (18) engaged in the work of vlogging fails to maintain the records
as provided in subsection (c) of this section or to deposit compensation required by the provisions
of this chapter, the minor, through the minor's parents, guardian or representative, may commence
a civil action to enforce the provisions of this chapter.
28-3-9.3. Minors engaged in the work of vlogging -- Trust fund.
(a) A minor satisfying the criteria described in § 28-3-9.2(a) shall be compensated by the
vlogger. The vlogger shall set aside from gross earnings on the video content, including the
likeness, name, or photograph of the minor in a trust account, to be preserved for the benefit of the
minor upon reaching the age of majority, according to the following distribution formula:
(1) Where only one minor meets the content threshold described in § 28-3-9.2, the
percentage of total gross earnings on any video segment, including the likeness, name, or
photograph of the minor, shall be as follows:
(i) For a video segment including the likeness, name or photograph of the minor that is
equal to or greater than thirty percent (30%) of the vlogs, compensation shall be paid to the minor,
in an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the gross earnings;
(ii) For video segments including the likeness, name or photograph of the minor that is
equal to or greater than fifty percent (50%) of the vlog but less than seventy-five percent (75%),
compensation shall be paid to the minor in the amount of twenty-five percent (25%) of the gross
earnings; and
(iii) Any video segment including the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor equal to
or greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of the vlog, shall result in compensation paid to the
minor in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of gross revenues. All compensation shall be paid and
deposited into a trust account pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(2) Where more than one minor meets the content threshold described in § 28-3-9.2 and a
video segment includes more than one of those minors, the percentage described in subsection
(a)(1) of this section for all minors in any segment, shall be equally divided between the minors,
regardless of differences in percentage of content provided by the individual minors.
(b) A trust account required under this section shall provide, at a minimum, the following:
(1) That the funds in the account shall be available only to the minor engaged in the work
of vlogging;
(2) That the account shall be held by a bank as defined in § 6A-4-105, corporate fiduciary
as defined in § 6A-3-307, or trust company as defined in § 18-13-1, as those terms are defined in
LC000602 - Page 3 of 6

title 7 and shall be specifically identified as belonging to the minor;
(3) That the funds in the account shall become available to the minor engaged in the work
of vlogging, upon the minor attaining the age of eighteen (18) years or upon the minor being
declared emancipated or upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction; and
(4) That the account meets the requirements of chapter 7 of tile 18.
(c) If a vlogger knowingly or recklessly violates this section to include a violation by a
family member, a minor satisfying the criteria provided of § 28-3-9.2(a) may, through an action
brought by a parent, guardian or representative, enforce the provisions of this chapter to include,
but not limited to, establishment of a trust account. The court may award, to the minor in the action
brought by the parent, guardian or representative who prevails in any action to enforce the
provisions of this chapter, the following damages:
(1) Actual damages;
(2) Punitive damages; and
(3) Attorneys' fees and litigation costs.
(d) This section does not affect a right or remedy available under any other law of the state.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to have any effect on a party that is neither
the vlogger nor the minor engaged in the work of vlogging.
28-3-9.4. Right to be forgotten.
(a) Upon the age of majority, any individual to whom as a minor child, as defined in § 28-
3-1.1 of this chapter, previously applied may request the permanent deletion of any video segment
including the likeness, name, or photograph of the individual from any internet platform or network
that provided compensation to the individual's parent or parents in exchange for that video content.
(b) A social media platform that receives a deletion request under subsection (a) of this
section shall take all reasonable steps to permanently delete all content for which the request was
made.
(c) A contract between a vlogger and a social media platform for the creation of video
content that would reasonably be anticipated to feature a minor child shall include notification to
the social media platform of the rights of the child under this section.
(d) An internet platform or network shall take all reasonable steps to permanently delete
the video segment for which a request described in subsection (a) of this section has been made.
(e) Any contract with an internet platform or network for the exchange or uses of video
content that would reasonably be anticipated to include greater than a de minimis use of a vlogger's
minor child shall include notification to the internet platform or network of the minor child's future
rights as provided in this section.
LC000602 - Page 4 of 6

SECTION 2. Section 28-3-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-3 entitled "Employment
of Children" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-3-1. Places and times where employment of children prohibited.
No Except in occupations specifically authorized by § 28-3-9.2, no child under fourteen
(14) years of age shall be employed or permitted or suffered to work at any time in any business or
industrial establishment in this state. No child under sixteen (16) years of age shall be employed or
permitted or suffered to work at any time in any factory, mechanical, or manufacturing
establishment within this state. A child who has reached the fourteenth (14th) birthday, but has not
reached the sixteenth (16th) birthday, may be employed only between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and
7:00 p.m; except that a child who has reached the fourteenth (14th) birthday, but has not reached
the sixteenth (16th) birthday, may be employed until 9:00 p.m. but only during school vacations;
and except as provided in § 28-3-3 no child under sixteen (16) years of age shall be employed or
permitted or suffered to work in any business establishment within this state. Every person willfully
violating the provisions of this section shall be fined as provided in § 28-3-20.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000602
========
LC000602 - Page 5 of 6